Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-2003
Local distribution utility; interconnect qualified facility of customer-generator; interconnection agreement; requirements; powers and duties.

(1) A local distribution utility shall interconnect the qualified facility of any customer-generator that enters into an interconnection agreement with the local distribution utility, satisfies the requirements for a qualified facility and all other requirements of sections 70-2001 to 70-2005, and pays for costs incurred by the local distribution utility for equipment or services required for interconnection that would not be necessary if the qualified facility were not interconnected to the local distribution system, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section and as may be provided for in the utility's aid in construction policy.

(2) A local distribution utility shall provide at no additional cost to any customer-generator with a qualified facility a metering system that is capable of measuring the flow of electricity in both directions and may be accomplished through use of a single, bidirectional electric revenue meter that has only a single register for billing purposes, a smart metering system, or another meter configuration that can easily be read by the customer-generator.

(3) A local distribution utility may, at its own expense, install additional monitoring equipment to separately monitor the flow of electricity in each direction as may be necessary to accomplish the reporting requirements of sections 70-2001 to 70-2005.

(4) Subject to the requirements of sections 70-2001 to 70-2005 and the interconnection agreement, a local distribution utility shall provide net metering to any customer-generator with a qualified facility. The local distribution utility shall allow a customer-generator's retail electricity consumption to be offset by a qualified facility that is interconnected with the local distribution system. A qualified facility's net excess generation during a billing period, if any, shall be determined by the local distribution utility in accordance with section 70-2002 and shall be credited to the customer-generator at a rate equal to the local distribution utility's avoided cost of electricity supply during the billing period, and the monetary credits shall be carried forward from billing period to billing period and credited against the customer-generator's retail electric bills in subsequent billing periods. Any excess monetary credits shall be paid out to coincide with the final bill at the end of each annualized period or within sixty days after the date the customer-generator terminates its retail service.

(5) A local distribution utility shall not be required to provide net metering to additional customer-generators, regardless of the output of the proposed generation unit, after the date during a calendar year on which the total generating capacity of all customer-generators using net metering served by such local distribution utility is equal to or exceeds one percent of the capacity necessary to meet the local distribution utility's average aggregate customer monthly peak demand forecast for that calendar year.

(6) No local distribution utility may require a customer-generator whose qualified facility meets the standards established under sections 70-2001 to 70-2005 to:

(a) Comply with additional safety or performance standards or pay additional charges for equipment or services for interconnection that are additional to those necessary to meet the standards established under sections 70-2001 to 70-2005;

(b) Perform or pay for additional tests; or

(c) Purchase additional liability insurance if all safety and interconnection requirements are met.

(7) Nothing in sections 70-2001 to 70-2005 prevents a local distribution utility from entering into other arrangements with customers desiring to install electric generating equipment or from providing net metering to customer-generators having renewable generation units with a rated capacity above twenty-five kilowatts.

Laws 2009, LB436, § 3.